apertium-lit.lit.dix
    <pardef n="dang/us__n_m">
      <e><p><l>aus</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ui</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ų</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uje</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>au</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>umi</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>us</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ums</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>us</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uose</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ūs</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>umis</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ūs</l><r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="asm/uo__n_m">
      <e><p><l>ens</l><r>uo<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eniui</l><r>uo<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>enį</l><r>uo<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>enyje</l><r>uo<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>enie</l><r>uo<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eniu</l><r>uo<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uo</l><r>uo<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>en</l><r>uo<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>enims</l><r>uo<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>enis</l><r>uo<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>enyse</l><r>uo<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>enys</l><r>uo<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>enimis</l><r>uo<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>enys</l><r>uo<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="ož/ys__n_m">
      <e><p><l>io</l><r>ys<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iui</l><r>ys<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>į</l><r>ys<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yje</l><r>ys<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>y</l><r>ys<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iu</l><r>ys<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ys</l><r>ys<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ių</l><r>ys<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iams</l><r>ys<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ius</l><r>ys<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iuose</l><r>ys<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iai</l><r>ys<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iais</l><r>ys<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iai</l><r>ys<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="mint/is__n_m">
      <e><p><l>ies</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iui</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>į</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yje</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ie</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>imi</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>is</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ių</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ims</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>is</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yse</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ys</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>imis</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ys</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="ver/tė__n_f">
      <e><p><l>tės</l><r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tei</l><r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tę</l><r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tėje</l><r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>te</l><r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>te</l><r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tė</l><r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>čių</l><r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tėms</l><r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tes</l><r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tėse</l><r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tės</l><r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tėmis</l><r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tės</l><r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="tu/gus__n_m">
      <e><p><l>gaus</l><r>gus<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gui</l><r>gus<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gų</l><r>gus<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>guje</l><r>gus<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gau</l><r>gus<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gumi</l><r>gus<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gus</l><r>gus<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gų</l><r>gus<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gums</l><r>gus<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rgus</l><r>gus<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>guose</l><r>gus<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gūs</l><r>gus<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gumis</l><r>gus<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gūs</l><r>gus<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     

    <e lm="junginys"><i>jungin</i><par n="ož/ys__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="našlaitė"><i>našlai</i><par n="ver/tė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="asmuo"><i>asm</i><par n="asm/uo__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="turinys"><i>turin</i><par n="ož/ys__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ožys"><i>ož</i><par n="ož/ys__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="garnys"><i>garn</i><par n="ož/ys__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="arklys"><i>arkl</i><par n="ož/ys__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="lokys"><i>lok</i><par n="ož/ys__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="leidinys"><i>leidin</i><par n="ož/ys__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="gyvatė"><i>gyva</i><par n="ver/tė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="įrenginys"><i>įrengin</i><par n="ož/ys__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="mintis"><i>mint</i><par n="mint/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="vertė"><i>ver</i><par n="ver/tė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="darbdavys"><i>darbdav</i><par n="ož/ys__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="narys"><i>nar</i><par n="ož/ys__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="aikštė"><i>aikš</i><par n="ver/tė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="dangus"><i>dang</i><par n="dang/us__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="veiksnys"><i>veiksn</i><par n="ož/ys__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="tugus"><i>tu</i><par n="tu/gus__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="savaitė"><i>savai</i><par n="ver/tė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="šventė"><i>šven</i><par n="ver/tė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="obuolys"><i>obuol</i><par n="ož/ys__n_m"/></e>
